Maryland, session 2025, HB0119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
[9–303.2.
(a) In addition to any duties set forth elsewhere, the Office shall conduct
necessary and appropriate research to determine the nature and extent of the problems
concerning black males and offer recommendations exclusively pertinent to black males in
the areas of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0119*

HOUSE BILL 119
(1) unemployment;
(2) criminal justice;
(3) education; and
(4) health.
(b) As authorized by the Governor, the Special Secretary may create an Advisory
Committee on Black Males to assist and advise the Office in developing recommendations
in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The Office shall submit its findings and recommendations in accordance with
this section to the Governor and, subject to § 2–1257 of this article, the General Assembly
on or before January 1, 1995 and annually thereafter.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.